California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a person licensed as a psychologist or registered as a research psychoanalyst have minimal but appropriate training in the areas of child, elder, and dependent adult abuse assessment and reporting. It is not intended that, by solely complying with this section, a practitioner is fully trained in the subject of treatment of child, elder, and dependent adult abuse victims and abusers.

(f) The board is encouraged to include coursework regarding the assessment and reporting of elder and
 dependent adult abuse in the required training on aging and long-term care issues prior to licensure or registration or license or registration renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 14.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2915.3.

(a) The board shall consider adoption of continuing education requirements, including training in the area of recognizing chemical dependency and early intervention, for all persons applying for renewal of a license as a psychologist or registration as a research psychoanalyst.

(b) Prior to the adoption of any regulations imposing continuing education relating to alcohol and other chemical dependency, the board is urged to consider coursework to include, but not necessarily be limited to, the following topics:

(1) Historical and contemporary perspectives on alcohol and other drug abuse.

(2) Extent of the alcohol and drug abuse epidemic and its effects on the individual, family, and community.

(3) Recognizing the symptoms of alcoholism and drug addiction.

(4) Making appropriate interpretations, interventions, and referrals.

(5) Recognizing and intervening with affected family members.

(6) Learning about current programs of recovery, such as 12-step programs, and how therapists can effectively utilize these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 15.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2915.4.

(a) Effective January 1, 2020, an applicant for licensure as a psychologist shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of the applicant’s qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a transcript indicating completion of this coursework. In the absence of this coursework title in the transcript, the applicant shall submit a written certification from the registrar, department chair, or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated
 stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained as part of the applicant’s applied experience. Applied experience can be met in any of the following settings: practicum, internship, or formal postdoctoral placement that meets the requirement of Section 2911, or other qualifying supervised professional experience. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience has occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied experience.

(3) By taking a continuing education course that meets the requirements of subdivision
 (e) or (f) of Section 2915 and that qualifies as a continuing education learning activity category specified in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2915. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) Effective January 1, 2020, as a one-time requirement, a licensee prior to the time of their first renewal after the operative date of this section, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status, shall have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention, as specified in subdivision (a). Proof of compliance with this section shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 53.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2915.5.

(a) Any applicant for licensure as a psychologist, as a condition of licensure, shall complete a minimum of six contact hours of coursework or applied experience in aging and long-term care, which may include, but need not be limited to, the biological, social, and psychological aspects of aging. This coursework shall include instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(b) In order to satisfy the coursework requirement of this section, the applicant shall submit to the board a transcript indicating completion of this coursework. In the absence of this coursework title in the transcript, the applicant shall
 submit a written certification from the registrar, department chair, or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s required curriculum for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework, that was completed by the applicant.

(c) (1) If an applicant does not have coursework pursuant to this section, the applicant may obtain evidence of compliance as part of their applied experience in a practicum, internship, or formal postdoctoral placement that meets the requirement of Section 2911, or other qualifying supervised professional experience.

(2) To satisfy the applied experience requirement of this
 section, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied experience.

(d) If an applicant does not meet the curriculum or coursework requirement pursuant to this section, the applicant may obtain evidence of compliance by taking a continuing education course that meets the requirements of subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 2915 and that qualifies as a learning activity category specified in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2915. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(e) A written certification made or
 submitted pursuant to this section shall be done under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 16.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2916.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any of the provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without such invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1677.)
-------------------------------------------

2918.

The confidential relations and communications between psychologist and client shall be privileged as provided by Article 7 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

2919.

A licensed psychologist shall retain a patient’s health service records for a minimum of seven years from the patient’s discharge date. If the patient is a minor, the patient’s health service records shall be retained for a minimum of seven years from the date the patient reaches 18 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [2920. - 2936.]

2920.

(a) The Board of Psychology shall enforce and administer this chapter. The board shall consist of nine members, four of whom shall be public members.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 17.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2920.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Board of Psychology in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2920.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 2920 renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 18.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2921.

Each member of the board shall hold office for a term of four years, and shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which he or she was appointed, whichever first occurs. No member may serve for more than two consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2922.

In appointing the members of the board, except the public members, the Governor shall use his or her judgment to select psychologists who represent, as widely as possible, the varied professional interests of psychologists in California.

The Governor shall appoint two of the public members and the five licensed members of the board qualified as provided in Section 2923. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member, and their initial appointment shall be made to fill,
 respectively, the first and second public member vacancies which occur on or after January 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2923.

Each member of the board shall have all of the following qualifications:

(a) He or she shall be a resident of this state.

(b) Each member appointed, except the public members shall be a licensed psychologist.

The public members shall not be licentiates of the board or of any board under this division or of any board referred to in the Chiropractic Act or the Osteopathic Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2924.

The Governor has power to remove from office any member of the board for neglect of any duty required by this chapter, for incompetency, or for unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

2925.

The board shall elect annually a president and vice president from among its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2926.

The board shall hold at least one regular meeting each year. Additional meetings may be held upon call of the chairman or at the written request of any two members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2927.

Five members of the board shall at all times constitute a quorum.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2932 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 69.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2927.5.

Notice of each regular meeting of the board shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 66.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2928.

The board shall administer and enforce this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2929.

The board shall adopt a seal, which shall be affixed to all licenses issued by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2930.

The board shall from time to time adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate this chapter. In adopting rules and regulations the board shall comply with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

2931.

The board shall examine and pass upon the qualifications of the applicants for a license as provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2934.

Notwithstanding Section 112, the board may issue, biennially, a current geographical directory of licensed psychologists. The directory may be sent to licensees and to other interested parties at cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

2934.1.

The board may post on its internet website information on all current and former licensees and registrants, including the following:

(a) Any record of a disciplinary action.

(b) Any of the following actions or proceedings against the licensee or registrant:

(1) Temporary restraining orders.

(2) Interim suspension orders.

(3) Orders restricting licensed activity pursuant to Section 23 of the Penal Code. 

(4) Revocations, suspensions, probations, public letters of reproval, or limitations on practice ordered by the board or by a court with jurisdiction in the state, including those made part of a probationary order, cease practice order, or stipulated settlement.

(5) Accusations or petitions to revoke filed by the board, including those accusations that are on appeal, excluding ones that have been dismissed or withdrawn where the action is no longer pending.

(6) Decisions by the board on petitions for early termination or modification of probation and petitions for reinstatement. 

(7) Citations issued by the board, unless withdrawn, for five years from the date of issuance.

(8) All of the following historical information in its possession, custody, or control regarding all current and former licensees and registrants:

(9) Institutions that awarded the qualifying educational degree and type of degree awarded.

(10) A link to the licensee’s or registrant’s professional internet website. Any link that provides access to a licensee’s or registrant’s professional internet website, once clicked, shall be accompanied by a notification that informs the internet website viewer that they are no longer on the board’s internet website.

(11) Other information designated by the board in regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 19.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2935.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

2936.

The board shall adopt a program of consumer and professional education in matters relevant to the ethical practice of psychology. The board shall establish as its standards of ethical conduct relating to the practice of psychology, the “Ethical Principles of Psychologists and Code of Conduct” published by the American Psychological Association (APA). The board shall apply those standards as the accepted standard of care in all licensing examination development and in all board enforcement policies and disciplinary case evaluations.

To help consumers receive appropriate psychological services, all licensed psychologists shall post, in a conspicuous location in their principal psychological business office, if any, and
 in their informed consent agreement a notice that reads as follows:

“NOTICE TO CONSUMERS: The Department of Consumer Affair’s Board of Psychology receives and responds to questions and complaints regarding the practice of psychology. If you have questions or complaints, you may contact the board by email at bopmail@dca.ca.gov, on the Internet at www.psychology.ca.gov, by calling 1-866-503-3221, or by writing to the following address:Board of Psychology
1625 North Market Boulevard, N-215
Sacramento, California 95834”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 20.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. License [2940. - 2949.]

2940.

To obtain a license from the board, an applicant shall submit any applications and pay any applicable fees as prescribed in Section 2987. These fees shall not be refunded by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 60.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2941.

(a) Each applicant for licensure as a psychologist shall take and pass any examination required by the board. An applicant may be examined for knowledge in any theoretical or applied fields of psychology, as well as professional skills and judgment in the use of psychological techniques and methods and the ethical practice of psychology, as the board deems appropriate.

(b) Each applicant shall pay any applicable examination fees as prescribed in Section 2987. These fees shall not be refunded by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 62.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2942.

The board may examine by written or computer-assisted examination or by both. All aspects of the examination shall be in compliance with Section 139. The examination shall be available for administration at least twice a year at the time and place and under supervision as the board may determine. The passing grades for the examinations shall be established by the board in regulations and shall be based on psychometrically sound principles of establishing minimum qualifications and levels of competency.

The board may utilize examinations for a psychologist’s license under a uniform examination system, and for that purpose the board may make arrangements with organizations to supply and administer examination materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 14.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2943.

The board may examine for knowledge in whatever theoretical or applied fields in psychology as it deems appropriate. It may examine the candidate with regard to his or her professional skills and his or her judgment in the utilization of psychological techniques and methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

2946.

(a) The board shall grant a license to any person who passes the board’s supplemental licensing examination and, at the time of application, has been licensed for at least two years by a psychology licensing authority in another state or territory of the United States or
 Canadian province if the requirements for obtaining a certificate or license to practice psychology in that state, territory, or province were substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter.

(b) A psychologist certified or licensed in another
 state, territory, or province
 who has applied to the board for a license in this state may perform activities and services of a psychological nature without a valid California license for a period not to exceed 180 calendar days from the time of submitting their application or from the commencement of residency in this state, whichever first occurs.

(c) A
 psychologist certified or licensed in another state or province who is married to, or in a domestic partnership or other legal union with, an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States and who has made application to the board for a license in this state may perform activities and services of a psychological nature without a valid license for a period not to exceed twelve months from the time of submitting their application or from the commencement of residency in this state, whichever first occurs.

(d) The board at its discretion may waive the
 examinations when in the judgment of the board the applicant has already demonstrated competence in areas covered by the examinations. The board at its discretion may waive the examinations for diplomates of the American Board of Professional Psychology. An applicant shall take and pass the required examinations unless waived by the board pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 693, Sec. 5.5.   (AB 107)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2948.

The board shall issue a license to all applicants who meet the requirements of this chapter and who pay to the board the initial license fee provided in Section 2987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2949.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, a committee of the board formed to address issues relating to licensure, and to which the board delegates authority to consider and decide requests from an applicant or licensee pertaining to their qualifications for licensure, may convene in closed session to consider and decide a request from an applicant or licensee for either of the following:

(1) An extension of time to gain supervised professional experience to meet the experience requirements for licensure.

(2) An extension of time to hold a
 psychological associate registration beyond the maximum period otherwise allowed pursuant to regulations.

(b) The committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of the applicant or licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 17.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Research Psychoanalysts [2950. - 2954.6.]

2950.

(a) Graduates of the Psychoanalytic Center of California, the Los Angeles Institute and Society for Psychoanalytic Studies, the San Francisco Center for Psychoanalysis, the San Diego Psychoanalytic Center, or institutes deemed equivalent by the board who have completed clinical training in psychoanalysis may engage in psychoanalysis as an adjunct to teaching, training, or research and hold themselves out to the public as psychoanalysts, and students in those institutes may engage in psychoanalysis under supervision, if the students and graduates do not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “psychological,” “psychologist,” “psychology,” “psychometrists,” “psychometrics,” or
 “psychometry,” or that they do not state or imply that they are licensed to practice psychology.

(b) Those students and graduates seeking to engage in psychoanalysis under this article shall register with the board, presenting evidence of their student or graduate status. The board may suspend or revoke the exemption of those persons for unprofessional conduct as defined in Sections 28, 490, 726, 729, 2936, 2960, 2960.1, 2960.6, 2963, 2966, 2969, and 2996.

(c) Each application for registration as a research psychoanalyst or student research psychoanalyst shall be made upon an online electronic form, or other form, provided by the board, and each application form shall contain a legal verification by the applicant certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by
 the applicant is true and correct and that any information in supporting documents provided by the applicant is true and correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 21.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2951.

(a) The use of any controlled substance or the use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages, to the extent, or in such a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to the registrant, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that this use impairs the ability of the registrant to practice safely or more than one misdemeanor or any felony conviction involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this section, or any combination thereof, constitutes unprofessional conduct. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence of this unprofessional conduct.

(b) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed
 to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order discipline of the registrant in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) or may order the denial of the registration when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing this person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 30.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 2954.)
-------------------------------------------

2952.

(a) Each person to whom registration is granted under the provisions of this article shall pay into the Psychology Fund a fee to be fixed by the board at a sum of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) The registration shall expire after two years. The registration may be renewed biennially at a fee fixed by the board at a sum not in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75). Students seeking to renew their registration shall present to the board evidence of their continuing student status.

(c) The fee for fingerprint hard card processing for out-of-state applicants shall be one hundred eighty-four dollars ($184). Applicants
 shall also pay the actual cost to the board of processing the fingerprint hard card with the Department of Justice and Federal Bureau of Investigation. 

(d) The money in the Psychology Fund shall be used for the administration of this chapter. Any moneys within the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California collected pursuant to Section 2529.5 as it read before the enactment of the statute that added this section shall be deposited in the Psychology Fund.

(e) The board may employ, subject to civil service regulations, whatever additional clerical assistance is necessary for the administration of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 22.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2953.1.

(a) The board shall require an applicant for registration as a research psychoanalyst and applicant for registration as a student research psychoanalyst, as defined in Section 2950, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 10.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.

This article shall take effect on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 30.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.1.

(a) An applicant for registration as a research psychoanalyst shall not be subject to denial of registration under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) An applicant for registration as a research psychoanalyst shall complete coursework or provide evidence of training in the detection and treatment of alcohol and other chemical substance dependency.

(c) An applicant for registration as a research psychoanalyst shall complete coursework or provide evidence of training in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 24.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.2.

(a) Except as provided in this section, the board shall renew the registration of a research psychoanalyst only if the research psychoanalyst has completed 36 hours of approved continuing professional development in the preceding two years.

(b) A registered research psychoanalyst who renews or applies to reinstate their registration pursuant to this chapter shall certify under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall retain proof of this compliance for submission to the board upon request. False statements submitted pursuant to this section shall be a violation of Section 2970.

(c) Continuing professional development means certain learning
 activities approved in three different categories:

(1) Professional activities.

(2) Academic activities.

(3) Sponsored continuing education coursework.

(d) The board may develop regulations further defining acceptable continuing professional development activities.

(e) Continuing education courses approved to meet the requirements of this section shall be approved for credit by organizations approved by the board. An organization previously approved by the board to provide or approve continuing education is deemed approved under this section.

(f) The board may accept continuing education courses approved by an entity that has demonstrated to the board in writing that it has, at a minimum, a 10-year history of providing educational programming for research psychoanalysts and has documented procedures for maintaining a continuing education approval program. The board shall adopt regulations necessary for implementing this section.

(g) The administration of this section may be funded through professional registration fees and continuing education provider and course approval fees, or both. The fees related to the administration of this section shall not exceed the costs of administering the corresponding provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 25.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.4.

(a) Effective January 1, 2026, an applicant for registration as a research psychoanalyst shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of the applicant’s qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a transcript indicating completion of this coursework. In the absence of this coursework title in the transcript, the applicant shall submit a written certification from the registrar,
 department chair, or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained as part of the applicant’s applied experience. Applied experience can be met in any of the following settings: practicum, internship, or other qualifying supervised professional experience. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience has occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied
 experience.

(3) By taking a continuing education course that meets the requirements of subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 2954.2 and that qualifies as a continuing education learning activity category specified in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2954.2. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) Effective January 1, 2020, as a one-time requirement, a registrant, prior to the time of their first renewal after the operative date of this section, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active registration status, shall have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention, as specified in subdivision (a). Proof
 of compliance with this section shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 26.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.5.

(a) Effective January 1, 2026, an applicant for registration as a research psychoanalyst, as a condition of licensure, shall complete a minimum of six contact hours of coursework or applied experience in aging and long-term care, which may include, but is not limited to, the biological, social, and psychological aspects of aging. This coursework shall include instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(b) In order to satisfy the coursework requirement of this section, the applicant shall submit to the board a transcript indicating completion of this coursework. In the absence of this
 coursework
 title in the transcript, the applicant shall submit a written
 certification from the registrar, department chair, or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s required curriculum for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework, that was completed by the applicant.

(c) (1) If an applicant does not have coursework pursuant to this section, the applicant may obtain evidence of compliance as part of their applied experience in a practicum, internship, or other qualifying supervised professional experience.

(2) To satisfy the applied experience requirement of this section, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the
 director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied experience.

(d) If an applicant does not meet the curriculum or coursework requirement pursuant to this section, the applicant may obtain evidence of compliance by taking a continuing education course that meets the requirements of subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 2954.2 and that qualifies as a learning activity category specified in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2954.2. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(e) A written certification made or submitted pursuant to this section shall be done under penalty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 27.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.6.

(a) The board shall adopt a program of consumer and professional education in matters relevant to the ethical practice of psychoanalysis. The board shall establish as its standards of ethical conduct relating to the practice of psychoanalysis, the “APsA Code of Ethics” published by the American Psychoanalytic Association. Those standards shall be applied by the board as the accepted standard of care in all registration examination development and in all board enforcement policies and disciplinary case evaluations.

(b) To facilitate consumers in receiving appropriate psychoanalysis services, all registrants shall be required to post, in a conspicuous
 location in their principal psychoanalysis business office, a notice that reads as follows:

“NOTICE TO CONSUMERS:   The Department of Consumer Affair’s Board of Psychology receives and responds to questions and complaints regarding the practice of psychoanalysis. If you have questions or complaints, you may contact the board by email at bopmail@dca.ca.gov, on the internet at www.psychology.ca.gov, by calling 1-866-503-3221, or by writing to the following address:

  Board of Psychology

  1625 North Market Boulevard, Suite N–215

  Sacramento, California 95834”

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 28.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Denial, Suspension and Revocation [2960. - 2969.]

2960.

The board may refuse to issue any registration or license, or may issue a registration or license with terms and conditions, or may suspend or revoke the registration or license of any registrant or licensee if the applicant, registrant, or licensee has been guilty of unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions or duties of a psychologist or registered psychological associate.

(b) Use of any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or dangerous drug, or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to themselves, any
 other person, or the public, or to an extent that this use impairs their ability to perform the work of a psychologist with safety to the public.

(c) Fraudulently or neglectfully misrepresenting the type or status of license or registration actually held.

(d) Impersonating another person holding a psychology license or allowing another person to use their license or registration.

(e) Using fraud or deception in applying for a license or registration or in passing the examination provided for in this chapter.

(f) Paying, or offering to pay, accepting, or soliciting any consideration, compensation, or remuneration, whether monetary or otherwise, for the referral of clients.

(g) Violating
 Section 17500.

(h) Willful, unauthorized communication of information received in professional confidence.
